Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
E. Indemnification

§ 17-19-850.
Subarticle definitions.

As used in this subarticle:

“Corporation” includes any domestic or foreign predecessor entity of a corporation in a merger, consolidation or other transaction in which the predecessor’s existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction;

“Director” means an individual who is or was a director of a corporation or an individual who, while a director of a corporation, is or was serving at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another foreign or domestic business or nonprofit corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise. A director is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if the director’s duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the director to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a director;

“Expenses” include counsel fees;

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine (including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan), or reasonable expenses actually incurred with respect to a proceeding;

“Official capacity” means: (1) when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a corporation; and (2) when used with respect to an individual other than a director, as contemplated in W.S.

17-19-856

, the office in a corporation held by the officer or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by the employee or agent on behalf of the corporation. “Official capacity” does not include service for any other foreign or domestic business or nonprofit corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise;

“Party” includes an individual who was, is or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding;

“Proceeding” means any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative and whether formal or informal.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-851.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-19-852.
Mandatory indemnification.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the director was a party because he is or was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses actually incurred by the director in connection with the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-853.
Advance for expenses.

A corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding if:

The director furnishes the corporation a written undertaking, executed personally or on the director’s behalf, to repay the advance if the director is not wholly successful; and

A determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this subarticle.

The undertaking required by paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 17-19-854.
Court-ordered indemnification.

Unless limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation, a director of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the court after giving any notice the court considers necessary may order indemnification in the amount it considers proper if it determines the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under W.S.

17-19-852

, in which case the court shall also order the corporation to pay the director’s reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-855.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-19-856.
Indemnification of officers, employees and agents.

Unless limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation:

An officer, employee or agent of the corporation who is not a director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under W.S.

17-19-852

, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under W.S.

17-19-854

in each case, to the same extent as a director;

The corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under this subarticle to an officer, employee or agent of the corporation who is not a director to the same extent as to a director; and

A corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee or agent who is not a director to the extent, consistent with public policy, that may be provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-857.
Insurance.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another foreign or domestic business or nonprofit corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a director, officer, employee or agent, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify the person against the same liability under W.S.

17-19-852

or

17-19-856

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-858.
Application of subarticle.

The indemnification and advancement of expenses authorized by this subarticle shall not be exclusive of any other rights to which any director, officer, employee or agent may be entitled under any bylaw, agreement, vote of members or disinterested directors or otherwise, both as to any action in his official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding the office, and continues as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee or agent and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of that person.

If articles of incorporation limit indemnification or advance for expenses, indemnification and advance for expenses are valid only to the extent consistent with the articles.

This subarticle does not limit a corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with appearing as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.